South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (54) forty-two and three quarters percent of the net depreciated value of business personal property. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----